Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1016.
do enact as follows:SB1016,11Section 1. 20.437 (2) (cp) of the statutes is created to read:SB1016,2,4220.437 (2) (cp) Wisconsin works child care for child care employees. A sum 3sufficient for paying child care subsidies for child care employees under s. 49.155 4(2s).SB1016,25Section 2. 49.155 (1m) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1016,2,14649.155 (1m) Eligibility. (intro.) Except as provided in sub. (3g), the 7department shall determine, contract with a county department or agency to 8determine, or contract with a county department or agency to share determination 9of the eligibility of individuals residing in a particular geographic region or who are 10members of a particular Indian tribal unit for child care subsidies under this 11section. Under this section, and subject to sub. subs. (2) and (2s), an individual may 12receive a subsidy for child care for a child who has not attained the age of 13 or, if 13the child is disabled, who has not attained the age of 19, if the individual meets all 14of the following conditions:SB1016,315Section 3. 49.155 (1m) (a) 5m. of the statutes is created to read:SB1016,2,161649.155 (1m) (a) 5m. Being employed by a child care provider.SB1016,417Section 4. 49.155 (1m) (a) 6. of the statutes is amended to read:SB1016,2,191849.155 (1m) (a) 6. Taking a temporary break from an authorized activity 19specified in subds. 1. to 5. 5m.SB1016,520Section 5. 49.155 (1m) (c) 1. (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1016,3,9149.155 (1m) (c) 1. (intro.) Except as provided in subds. 1d., 1g., 1h., 1m., 2., 2and 3., and 4., the gross income of the individual’s family is at or below 200 percent 3of the poverty line for a family the size of the individual’s family. In calculating the 4gross income of the family, the department or county department or agency 5determining eligibility shall include court-ordered child or family support 6payments received by the individual, if those support payments exceed $1,250 per 7month, and income described under s. 49.145 (3) (b) 1. and 3., except that, in 8calculating farm and self-employment income, the department or county 9department or agency determining eligibility shall include the sum of the following:SB1016,610Section 6. 49.155 (1m) (c) 4. of the statutes is created to read:SB1016,3,121149.155 (1m) (c) 4. This paragraph does not apply if the individual is eligible 12for subsidies under sub. (2s).SB1016,713Section 7. 49.155 (1m) (cm) 4. of the statutes is created to read:SB1016,3,141449.155 (1m) (cm) 4. An employee of a child care provider.SB1016,815Section 8. 49.155 (1m) (cr) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1016,3,171649.155 (1m) (cr) (intro.) Except as provided under sub. subs. (2m) and (2s), the 17individual’s family meets all of the following asset restrictions:SB1016,918Section 9. 49.155 (2s) of the statutes is created to read:SB1016,3,241949.155 (2s) Eligibility for child care employees. Notwithstanding sub. 20(1m) (c), (cm), and (cr), an individual is eligible for subsidies under this section from 21the appropriation account under s. 20.437 (2) (cp) if the individual does not meet all 22of the conditions under sub. (1m) (c), (cm), and (cr) but does meet the conditions 23under sub. (1m) (a), (b), (bm), (br), and (d) and is an employee of a child care 24provider.SB1016,101Section 10. Fiscal changes.SB1016,4,52(1) In the schedule under s. 20.005 (3) for the appropriation to the department 3of children and families under s. 20.437 (2) (a), the dollar amount for fiscal year 42025-26 is increased by $1,200,000 for administrative costs associated with 5providing child care subsidies to child care employees under this act.SB1016,4,66